Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 5 Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement
24-5-101. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Accumulated contribution” means the sum of all amounts deducted from the salary or wages of a member, or paid by a member, and credited to his or her individual account, together with any interest the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System may have authorized to be credited to the member's account;

“Actuarial equivalent” means a benefit of equal reserve value when reserve is the present value of all payment to be made on account of any benefit based upon such reasonable rate of interest and table of experience as a plan shall adopt from time to time;

“Average compensation” means the average of the highest annual compensation paid a member during any period of thirty-six (36) consecutive months of creditable service with a state employer, as the term “state employer” is defined in § 24-2-401;

“Board” means the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System;

“Creditable service” means the current service of the member plus the portion of prior service time for which contributions have been made or elected to be made by the member.

Retirement benefits shall be computed upon the creditable service of the member.

The board shall determine by appropriate rules how much service in any fiscal year is the equivalent of a year of creditable service;

“Current service” means service as an employee of the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation after the date of establishment of the system and may include the period of time during which the employee's service may have been interrupted by service in the United States Armed Forces. The annual earnings for a military service period shall be computed in the manner set forth for prior service in subdivision (12) of this section;

“Employee” means any employee of the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation whose compensation is, or was, payable on an hourly, biweekly, monthly, annual, or other basis by the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation, including any employee of the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation whose salary is paid or reimbursed, in whole or in part, from federal or other funds.

“Employee” does not include persons who are employees of the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation on or after July 1, 1997, and who are eligible for benefits under, or who are earning a retirement benefit from, another state-supported retirement system;

“Employer” means the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation;

“Lump-sum service” means that, upon termination of employment with the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation for whatever reason, all lump-sum payments of leave, salary, or other compensation shall not be considered for purposes of computing average earnings and time of service for the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System;

“Member” means any person who has, by due process, had issued to him or her a certificate of membership in the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System;

“Prior service” means all service as an employee of the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation before the date of establishment of the system;

“Prior service earnings” means the authenticated record filed with and approved by the board setting forth the salary received by the member for each fiscal year, or portion thereof, of his or her prior service as an employee, beginning with his or her last year of prior service and continuing in reverse chronological order.

Prior service earnings records may include the period of time during which the employee's service may have been interrupted for service in the United States Armed Forces, in which case the annual earnings for the military service period of the member shall be computed upon the average of his or her last twelve (12) months' compensation from the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation before his or her entry into the United States Armed Forces and the first twelve (12) months' compensation after reemployment by the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation;

“Prorate” means the amount obligated in § 24-5-125 using a ratio of the years of service credit with the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System divided by the sum of all years of service credit with the reciprocal systems enumerated in § 24-2-401;

“Salary” or “compensation” means the total remuneration earned by an employee for services rendered during any consecutive twelve (12) months or fraction thereof; and

“System” means the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, § 1; 1953, No. 403, §§ 1, 2; 1969, No. 167, § 1; 1979, No. 126, § 1; 1981, No. 295, §§ 1, 2; 1983, No. 464, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1901; Acts 1993, No. 930, § 1; 1997, No. 349, § 1; 1997, No. 955, § 1; 2011, No. 18, § 1; 2011, No. 564, § 1; 2013, No. 309, § 1; 2013, No. 310, § 1; 2017, No. 707, §§
269-273.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment by No. 18 deleted “unless the context otherwise requires” from the introductory language; in (1), inserted “or her” and substituted “Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System” for “board”;
inserted present (2) and (12) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; in (3), substituted “Arkansas” for “Arkansa” and deleted “as created by this chapter” from the end; deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (4)(C); substituted “‘Employee’ does not” for “The term ‘employee’ specifically shall not” in (7)(B); and inserted “or her” twice in (11)(A) and twice in (11)(B).

The 2011 amendment by No. 564 added (14).

The 2013 amendment by No. 309 substituted “using a ratio of the years … reciprocal systems enumerated in § 24-2- 401” for “less any amount paid for similar benefits by other reciprocal systems, as such systems are enumerated in § 24-4-1” in (13).

The 2013 amendment by No. 310, in (9), inserted “not” following “compensation shall,” deleted “earnings for retirement purposes. Both the time and amount paid shall be” preceding “considered,” inserted “time of” preceding “service,” and deleted “and both the member's and the employer's contribution rates shall apply to the lump sum payments” from the end.

The 2017 amendment inserted “or the Arkansas Department of Transportation” in (6), (7)(A), (7)(B), (8), (11) and (12)(B); substituted “Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation” for “department” twice in (7)(A); and substituted “United States Armed Forces” for “armed forces” in (12)(B).

24-5-102. Penalty.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement or who falsifies any record or records in an attempt to defraud the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System as a result of such an act shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, § 6; 1981, No. 295, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1906; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 363.

24-5-103. Establishment of system.

There is created and established a retirement system for employees of the Arkansas Department of Transportation to be known as the “Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System”, all the business of which shall be transacted through a board of trustees as provided for in this chapter.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1902; Acts 2017, No. 707, §
274.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department”.

24-5-104. Board of trustees.

The administration and control of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System shall be vested in a board known as the “Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System”.

The board shall consist of seven (7) members:

The Director of State Highways and Transportation;

The Treasurer of State;

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration;

The Chief Engineer of the Arkansas Department of Transportation;

A retiree from the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation; and

Two (2) regularly qualified members of the system.

The board shall cause an election to be held by letter ballot in June of each year, after thirty (30) days' written notice to the membership, for the purpose of electing two (2) employee members and one (1) retiree member who shall serve for two (2) years.

In case of a vacancy of any employee member of the board, the board shall fill the vacancy until the next regular election, when the vacancy shall be filled by the election procedure specified in subdivision (b)(2) of this section.

The officers of the board shall be a chair and a vice chair, who shall be selected annually from their own number by the board, and an executive secretary, who shall be appointed by the board.

The duties of the board shall be:

To make all rules necessary and proper for carrying out the provisions of this chapter;

To provide administrative direction and control of the executive secretary and such clerical staff as may be required;

To provide for actuarial valuations if and when the board deems such action necessary;

To exercise discretionary power and authority in the investment and disbursement of the funds of the system, subject to the conditions prescribed in this chapter;

To designate the necessary medical examiners for disabled members as provided in this chapter;

To serve without pay but may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.;

To provide a one-million-dollar blanket fidelity bond covering board members and those employees of the department who may be responsible for administering the funds.

The premiums for the bond may be paid from the funds appropriated for the administration of the system or may be considered as a cost of administration and borne by the department as provided in § 24-5-105(a); and

To do any and all things necessary for the proper execution of this chapter.

The duties of the executive secretary shall be:

To keep all minutes and other records as directed by the board;

To set up and maintain separate accounts for each member of the system to show the payroll deductions and to transmit the deductions to the bank designated by the trustees as the depository for the system or to the State Treasury, as appropriate;

To prepare and sign, as directed by the board, all vouchers for all valid claims; and

To perform such other administrative duties as may be directed by the board for carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, §§ 3, 6; 1953, No. 403, § 3; 1969, No. 167, § 2; 1981, No. 295, §§ 3, 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 76-1903, 76-1906; Acts 1993, No. 615, §§ 1-3; 1997, No. 250, § 229; 2013, No. 73, §§ 1, 2; 2017, No. 201, §§ 1, 2; 2017, No. 707, §
275; 2019, No. 315, § 2866; 2019, No. 910, §
3554.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of subdivision (d)(7) of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to § 21-2-701 et seq. The subdivision may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See § 21-2-703.

Publisher's Notes.

The terms of the two employee members of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System are arranged so that one term expires every year.

The reimbursement provision in subdivision (d)(6) of this section may be affected by § 25-16-901 et seq. concerning mileage reimbursement for members of state boards and commissions.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “seven (7)” for “six (6)” in the introductory language to (b)(1); inserted present (b)(1)(A) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and deleted (e)(6).

The 2017 amendment by No. 201 substituted “who shall be appointed by the board” for “who shall be an accountant in the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department Accounting Division designated by the board to serve as executive secretary, without power to vote and who shall perform the duties provided in this section” in (c); deleted former (e)(4); and redesignated former (e)(5) as present (e)(4).

The 2017 amendment by No. 707 substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (b)(1)(D) and (c); inserted “or the Arkansas Department of Transportation” in (b)(1)(E); and substituted “(b)(2)” for “(b)” in (b)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (d)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (b)(1)(C).

24-5-105. Cost of administration — Payment of benefits and adjustment of errors.

The cost of administering the plan shall be borne by the Arkansas Department of Transportation, except that the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System shall pay the expenses incurred for the actuary, the consultant for investments, fees for the members of the medical board of the system, expenses associated with automating the accounting needs of the system, and forms purchased from vendors and identified by letterhead printing as those of the system.

The Treasurer of State shall pay retirement benefits, as defined in this chapter, to retirants only on vouchers signed by the Executive Secretary of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, or other authorized person, and on warrants or checks issued by the Auditor of State or other designated officer of the state.

The designated disbursing officers for the system are authorized to complete and sign one (1) certification for each state voucher or other designated document that authorizes the Auditor of State, or other official, to draw a state warrant or check on a fund administered by the system.

The voucher or other authorizing document can consist of one (1) or more pages.

In the event that more than one (1) page is used, then the designated disbursing officer is to manually sign the last page only, and any certification is to be so worded that it will apply to all pages of the document.

Should any change or error in the records of the system result in any member's receiving more or less than he or she would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, upon discovery of the error and so far as is practicable, shall adjust the payments in such a manner that the benefit to which the member was justly entitled shall be paid.

In the event that an overpayment is made to anyone, every legal effort shall be made to recover the overpayment.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, § 6; 1981, No. 295, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1906; Acts 1987, No. 213, § 2; 1999, No. 32, § 1; 2017, No. 707, §
276.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” and substituted “system” for “Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System” at the end.

24-5-106. Establishment of retirement fund.

There is created a trust fund to be known as the “Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System Fund”, which shall be the depository for moneys in the State Treasury or the designated bank as provided for in this chapter.

The employer shall draw vouchers or cause vouchers to be drawn upon the State Highway and Transportation Department Fund for deposit into the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System Fund for such sums of money as are provided in § 24-5-109 to match employee contributions as certified by the Executive Secretary of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System:

In accordance with the provisions of this section and §§ 24-5-101 — 24-5-105, 24-5-107 — 24-5-109, and 24-5-112 — 24-5-118; or

As provided under § 24-5-137.

The Treasurer of State, or a designated bank, shall be the legal custodian of the securities of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, subject to the orders and directions of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System.

The system may deposit with the Treasurer of State, or a designated bank, safekeeping receipts or, in the case of federal bookkeeping entries, the evidence of investment that is issued in lieu of the actual securities.

The Attorney General shall serve as legal advisor to the board.

It shall be the duty of the Legislative Auditor to audit the finances of the system one time or more often if either the auditor or the board consider such action necessary.

A decision on whether to invest, not invest, or withdraw from investment the funds of the system shall not be based on a consideration that the location of the investment, fund, company, or any other type of investment vehicle is in the State of Israel.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, § 4; 1969, No. 167, § 3; 1981, No. 295, §§ 4, 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1904; Acts 2011, No. 16, § 1; 2017, No. 796, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment subdivided (b) and added (b)(2); and substituted “Executive Secretary of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System” for “executive secretary” in the introductory language of (b).

The 2017 amendment added (f).

24-5-107. Membership.

Any employee of the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation, as defined in § 24-5-101(7), shall become a member of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System in the manner and under the conditions provided in this chapter.

Membership in the system may be terminated by retirement, disability, superannuation, or death, or by withdrawal, either voluntary or involuntary, from active service in the department.

Any member with not less than five (5) years of creditable service whose employment with the department is terminated for any reason may leave his or her contributions in the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System Fund and thereafter be entitled to retirement benefits as otherwise provided in this chapter.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, §§ 7, 8; 1969, No. 167, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 76-1907, 76-1908; Acts 1997, No. 347, § 1; 1997, No. 1053, § 12; 2017, No. 707, §
277.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “or the Arkansas Department of Transportation” in (a).

24-5-108. Members' contributions.

A member of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System shall be assessed six percent (6%) of his or her salary or wages by payroll deductions, and the Executive Secretary of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System shall transmit the payroll deductions from the member's salary or wages to the bank designated as the depository for the funds of the system or to the Treasurer of State, as appropriate.

Beginning on July 1, 2019, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System shall assess the member contribution rate after receiving recommendations from the actuary of the system.

An assessed member contribution rate shall be:

Not more than seven percent (7%) of compensation; and

Increased by no more than five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) in a single year.

As a means of increasing his or her annual annuity benefits, a member may elect, upon approval by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, to pay into the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System Fund to the credit of his or her account an amount equal to four percent (4%) of his or her earnings for each year of his or her authenticated prior and current service not covered, plus such interest as the board may prescribe.

Each year, or fractional part thereof, for which such prior and current service contributions are paid shall be added to the current service record of the member in computing his or her retirement benefits under the provisions of §§ 24-5-115 — 24-5-118, subject to the provision that no member may accrue more than thirty-five (35) years of creditable service.

As a means of increasing his or her annual annuity benefits, a member may elect, upon approval by the board, to pay into the fund to the credit of his or her account an amount equal to four percent (4%) of the amount that his or her earnings exceeded seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per annum for periods previously covered through June 30, 1969, plus such interest as the board may prescribe.

These earnings in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per annum on which supplemental contributions have been paid shall be credited to his or her average compensation in his or her service record in computing his or her retirement benefits under the provisions of §§ 24-5-115 — 24-5-118.

The plan for such payment shall be as prescribed by the board.

It is expressly guaranteed that all member contributions shall be held in trust for the exclusive benefit of the individual contributor.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, § 9; 1953, No. 403, §§ 6, 7; 1969, No. 167, § 5; 1975, No. 599, § 1; 1977, No. 722, § 1; 1981, No. 295, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1909; Acts 2019, No. 295, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System Fund is created at § 19-5-918.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added the (a)(1) designation; in (a)(1), substituted “A member” for “All members”, substituted “his or her salary” for “their salaries”, and substituted “member’s salary” for “employees’ salaries”; and added (a)(2).

24-5-109. Employer's contribution.

The employer contribution shall be a set percentage rate of the compensation of the employee as defined in § 24-5-101.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System shall determine the set percentage rate after receiving recommendations from the actuary for the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System.

The set percentage rate shall not be:

Less than twelve and nine-tenths percent (12.9%) of compensation; or

Greater than fourteen and nine-tenths percent (14.9%) of compensation.

In matching contributions paid under the provisions of § 24-5-108(b), the employer shall match all member contributions for authenticated prior and current service as follows:

Four percent (4%) contribution for service through August 15, 1969;

Six percent (6%) contribution for service from August 15, 1969, to July 1, 1975;

Nine and nine-tenths percent (9.9%) contribution for service from June 30, 1975, to March 20, 1977;

Eleven percent (11%) contribution for service from March 19, 1977, to July 1, 1979;

Twelve and sixty-five hundredths percent (12.65%) contribution for service from June 30, 1979, to June 25, 1981; and

Twelve and nine-tenths percent (12.9%) contribution for service from June 24, 1981.

In the event that sufficient money is provided to the system to pay the increase in annuities as authorized by § 24-7-714 from other than the fund from which the employees are paid their gross earnings, then the employer's contribution rate for the then-current year shall be twenty-five hundredths of one percent (0.25%) less than the rate stated in subsection (a) of this section.

In matching contributions under the provisions of § 24-5-108(b), the rate shall be the employer's contribution rate for the then-current year.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, § 10; 1953, No. 403, § 8; 1969, No. 167, § 6; 1975, No. 599, § 2; 1977, No. 722, § 2; 1979, No. 821, § 1; 1981, No. 295, §§ 8-10; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1910; Acts 2019, No. 295, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment rewrote (a).

24-5-110. Credit for prior and current service in department.

Any employee of the Arkansas Department of Transportation may make application within one (1) year from the date of becoming a member of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System and receive credit for any authenticated prior service rendered as an employee of the department prior to July 1, 1949.

In addition thereto, the employee may receive current service credit for any service rendered as an employee of the department since July 1, 1949, and prior to the date of becoming a member of the system, upon paying into the system to the credit of his or her account an amount equal to four percent (4%) of his or her earnings, not to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per annum, for each year of the authenticated prior service, or current service rendered prior to becoming a member of the system, in the event the employee has not previously obtained credit for such service.

The employee shall pay into the system such necessary contributions and interest as may be prescribed by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System within a period of five (5) years.

Not less than one-fifth (1/5) of the total prior service and current service contributions shall be paid during each year of the five-year period.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 254, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1913; Acts 1997, No. 347, § 2; 1997, No. 1053, § 13; 2017, No. 707, §
278.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (a)(1).

Cross References.

Reciprocity of service credits with other systems, § 24-2-401 et seq.

24-5-111. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning credit for prior service with public employer, was repealed by Acts 2011, No. 564, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1967, No. 254,
§ 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1914.

24-5-112. Eligibility for benefits — Voluntary retirement.

A member may retire voluntarily as follows:

At age sixty-five (65), or during any year thereafter until the age of compulsory retirement has been attained, with a minimum of five (5) years of creditable service in the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System;

At age sixty-two (62), with a minimum of fifteen (15) years of creditable service in the system;

At age sixty (60), with a minimum of twenty (20) years of creditable service in the system; or

Regardless of age, with thirty (30) years of creditable service in the system.

Any retired member who has creditable service with the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation for more than thirty-five (35) years and who is not receiving benefits based on his or her actual creditable service time, on February 27, 1991, shall have his or her annuity adjusted at that time.

The adjustment shall be equivalent to the retirant's original annuity, adjusted for actual service time and subsequent cost-of-living and any ad hoc increases.

The retirant shall be paid such adjusted annuity for each month thereafter.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, by rule, may reduce the amount of creditable service required to retire voluntarily regardless of age from thirty (30) years of creditable service to an amount of no less than twenty-eight (28) years of creditable service, if the board determines that the change is fair and just to the members of the system and that it is actuarially appropriate.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, § 11; 1963, No. 494, § 3; 1969, No. 167, § 7; 1985, No. 379, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1911; Acts 1991, No. 243, § 1; 1997, No. 347, § 3; 1997, No. 1053, § 14; 1999, No. 1325, § 5; 2017, No. 707, §
279; 2019, No. 315, § 2867.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “or the Arkansas Department of Transportation” in (b)(1).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (c).

24-5-113. Eligibility for benefits — Disability retirement — Definition.

A member shall be eligible for disability retirement benefits after five (5) or more years of creditable service in the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation, but no member shall be eligible to receive benefits for a disability incurred prior to his or her becoming a member of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System.

No member may be retired on account of disability until conclusive evidence, based on a proper medical examination, has been submitted to the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System that the member is disabled to the extent that he or she can no longer perform his or her assigned duties.

A member who is retired because of disability shall be required to undergo periodic medical examinations at the discretion of the board.

If and when a medical examination shows that the disability has been removed, disability retirement benefits shall cease.

A disability allowance shall not be granted unless there is conclusive evidence that the disability will be permanent or of long duration.

If a disability retirant secures employment with an employer not considered a state employer, as defined by § 24-2-401, for the purpose of determining whether he or she is capable of returning to employment, then the disability retirant shall be allowed to earn compensation from the employment for a period of time not to exceed nine (9) months, during which period of time the retirant shall receive no monthly benefits from the system.

If the retirant becomes unable to continue his or her employment before the nine-month period expires, then his or her disability retirement benefits from the system shall be reinstated and be effective the first day of the month after terminating employment.

Only one (1) trial work period is allowed any disability retirant, but the nine (9) months need not be consecutive.

The trial work period does not prevent the consideration of any medical evidence which may demonstrate recovery before the ninth month of trial work.

If, at the end of the nine-month trial work period, the retirant wishes to continue his or her employment outside the system, then the disability retirement status shall terminate.

For the purpose of determining eligibility for any other benefit, the retirant shall be considered to have terminated active membership as of the time of disability retirement but for a reason other than disability or death.

If the former disability retirant again becomes an employee of a state employer as defined by § 24-2-401, he or she shall immediately again become a member of the system, and his or her credited service at the time of disability retirement shall be restored.

The amount of the accumulated contributions at the time of his or her disability retirement shall be restored to the member's deposit account, but in no event shall he or she be given service credit for the period he or she was in receipt of his or her disability annuity.

As used in this section, “suitable job or position” means a job or position the requirements of which can be physically or mentally performed, as determined by a physician, and for which the remuneration would be substantially gainful, as defined by the Social Security Administration as the maximum amount that a person under sixty-five (65) years of age may earn.

At least one (1) time each year, the board may require any disability retirant to submit a form attesting to his or her current work status.

If such a retirant refuses to submit the form, his or her disability annuity may be suspended by the board until the form is properly submitted to the board.

If his or her refusal continues for one (1) year, all his or her rights in and to a disability annuity may be revoked by the board.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1911; Acts 1997, No. 347, § 4; 1997, No. 1053, § 15; 2017, No. 707, §
280.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “or the Arkansas Department of Transportation” in (a).

24-5-114. Eligibility for benefits — Early retirement.

In addition to retirement as provided in §§ 24-5-112 and 24-5-113, a member may retire after a minimum of five (5) years of service on and after the member's fifty-fifth birthday.

However, the annuity otherwise payable, as provided in § 24-5-115, shall be reduced eight-tenths of one percent (0.8%) for each of the first sixty (60) months, or fraction thereof, that the early retirement date precedes the earliest date that the member could retire without a reduction in the annuity.

The annuity shall be reduced three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) for each of the next sixty (60) months, or fraction thereof, that the early retirement date precedes the earliest date that the member could retire without a reduction in the annuity.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, § 11; 1981, No. 295, § 11; 1985, No. 379, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1911; Acts 1997, No. 347, § 5; 1997, No. 1053, § 16.

24-5-115. Benefits generally.

Members retired for the reasons set forth in §§ 24-5-112 — 24-5-114 shall be eligible for annual retirement benefits based on two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of their average compensation, as defined in § 24-5-101, limited to the amount upon which contributions, including supplemental contributions under the provisions of § 24-5-108(b), have been made, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service in the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System.

Payments shall be made in equal monthly installments.

In the event a member has not completed payment of his or her service contributions as provided for in § 24-5-108(b) and is current in his or her service contributions at the time of retirement, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System is authorized to deduct from each monthly annuity payment an amount equal to one-twelfth (1/12) of the unpaid balance of the service contributions.

The deductions shall continue until all service contributions have been paid in full.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, § 12; 1969, No. 167, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1912; Acts 1991, No. 41, § 1; 1991, No. 246, § 1; 1997, No. 386, § 1; 2001, No. 539, § 1.

24-5-116. Benefits — Death of member or retirant.

In the case of death of a member prior to retirement or of a member's beneficiary whose benefits have been deferred or who for any other reason has not withdrawn the member's contributions, the member's accumulated contributions and any life insurance policy proceeds shall become payable to the designated beneficiary or to the estate of the person having the deferred benefits if a beneficiary has not been designated or is deceased.

The designated beneficiary may be changed by the member or member's beneficiary in the manner prescribed by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, but the designated beneficiary shall have no legal claim on any contribution made by the state with a view to the retirement of the member or member's beneficiary.

A member may designate different persons to be the beneficiaries for a member's retirement and for his or her life insurance policy in the manner prescribed by the board.

If a retired member with a straight life annuity dies before he or she has been paid benefits equivalent to his or her contributions to the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, the difference between the benefits received and his or her contributions while an active member of the system, together with any other balance to his or her credit in the system, shall be paid to his or her designated beneficiary.

In the event there is no designated beneficiary, refund of the unpaid balance shall be paid to his or her estate.

Payment of the refund shall be made in full or in installments, as determined by the board.

The benefits may be paid directly to a curator or guardian, to an administrator or to an executor authorized to receive such payments, wherever such representative may be, without the appointment of a representative in this state.

The system shall provide life insurance in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for the benefit of each of its members.

The insurance shall remain in force during the life of each member until his or her retirement and shall be paid for by the system.

The system may offer a similar or lesser amount of life insurance coverage on the lives of the member's spouse and his or her dependents with the member bearing the costs of any additional coverage.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, § 12; 1979, No. 821, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1912; Acts 1997, No. 1089, § 1.

24-5-117. Benefits — Withdrawal from service.

In the case of withdrawal from service within less than one (1) year after having become a member of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, upon request, shall pay to the member all of his or her accumulated contributions without interest.

If withdrawal occurs after one (1) year of membership in the system, the board, upon request, shall pay to the member all of his or her accumulated contributions plus interest as determined by the board.

The member so reimbursed shall have no legal claim on any contribution made by the state with a view to his or her retirement.

Payment to a member under the conditions set forth in this subsection shall be made as provided by the board.

A member's interest in the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System shall be exempt from attachment and execution.

In the case of an employee's withdrawal from service after becoming a member of the system and when the employee's contribution has accumulated to a total of less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), then the employee's accumulated contribution shall become forfeit to the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System Fund unless withdrawn by the former employee from the fund within the first three (3) years following the employee's termination of service with the Arkansas Department of Transportation, provided that such employee is not a member of a reciprocal system.

In the event of forfeiture to the fund, the former employee shall have no further claim upon the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System.

The payment of the cost of the refunded service shall be based on an actuarial equivalent as prescribed by the board if a member:

Is reemployed by a state employer;

Has received a refund from the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System; and

Seeks to reinstate time withdrawn.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, § 12; 1969, No. 167, § 9; 1979, No. 126, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1912; Acts 1999, No. 33, § 1; 2011, No. 564, § 3; 2017, No. 707, §
281.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (c).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (b)(1).